Hawaii statutes.
[PART
XXVII.] CHILD DEATH REVIEW

[§321-341] Multidisciplinary and
multiagency reviews. The department of health may conduct
multidisciplinary and multiagency reviews of child deaths in order to reduce
the incidence of preventable child deaths. [L 1997, c 369, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next